apertium-en-af.af.dix
    <pardef n="artikel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="halfrond__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="albino__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aardbewing__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="na/am__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
	  <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vla/g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
	  <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vra/ag__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lys__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="ster__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="resulta/at__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
	  <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sko/ot__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="hoofst/ad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abakus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="glimlag__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ongeluk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="afspra/ak__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="da/ad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
	  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="besonderhe/id__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
	  <r>id<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
	  <r>id<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="voorde/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
	  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
	  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="atmosfe/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
	  <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
	  <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="kanto/or__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
	  <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
	  <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="avontu/ur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
	  <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
	  <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="staatsamptena/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sa/ak__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ouderdom__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lughawe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alternatie/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="stre/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
	  <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ho/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
	  <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
	  <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="monargie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="se/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="we/g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
	  <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
	  <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="filosofie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ba/an__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
	  <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
	  <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="halfrond"><i>halfrond</i><par n="halfrond__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gemiddeld"><i>gemiddeld</i><par n="halfrond__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monargie"><i>monargie</i><par n="monargie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekoloog"><i>ekolo</i><par n="ho/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="semioloog"><i>semiolo</i><par n="ho/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kodenaam"><i>kodena</i><par n="na/am__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoofstad"><i>hoofst</i><par n="hoofst/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoofweg"><i>hoofwe</i><par n="we/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gruweldaad"><i>gruwelda</i><par n="da/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hortjiespaneel"><i>hortjiespane</i><par n="voorde/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="argitektuur"><i>argitektu</i><par n="avontu/ur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nabyfoto"><i>nabyfoto</i><par n="albino__n"/></e>
    <e lm="donderdagmiddag"><i>donderdagmidda</i><par n="vla/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dinsdag"><i>dinsd</i><par n="vra/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="donderdag"><i>donderd</i><par n="vra/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naweek"><i>nawe</i><par n="stre/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banjo"><i>banjo</i><par n="albino__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biblioteek"><i>biblioteek</i><par n="stre/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ster"><i>ster</i><par n="ster__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hawe"><i>hawe</i><par n="lughawe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lewe"><i>lewe</i><par n="lughawe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spraak"><i>spra</i><par n="afspra/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="augustus"><i>augustus</i><par n="abakus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kasteel"><i>kaste</i><par n="voorde/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nar"><i>nar</i><par n="ster__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fee"><i>fe</i><par n="se/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raam"><i>ra</i><par n="na/am__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lag"><i>lag</i><par n="glimlag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leer"><i>le</i><par n="atmosfe/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verslag"><i>versla</i><par n="vla/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saad"><i>sa</i><par n="da/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyf"><i>ly</i><par n="alternatie/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uitspraak"><i>uitspra</i><par n="afspra/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voorstad"><i>voorst</i><par n="hoofst/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rog"><i>rog</i><par n="glimlag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skêr"><i>skêr</i><par n="ster__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eer"><i>e</i><par n="atmosfe/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stopbis"><i>stopbis</i><par n="abakus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swaartekrag"><i>swaartekrag</i><par n="lys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reiniging"><i>reiniging</i><par n="aardbewing__n"/></e>
    <e lm="internaat"><i>interna</i><par n="resulta/at__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sertifikaat"><i>sertifika</i><par n="resulta/at__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olieboot"><i>oliebo</i><par n="sko/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swempoot"><i>swempo</i><par n="sko/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bestuursvorm"><i>bestuursvorm</i><par n="artikel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eendersheid"><i>eendershe</i><par n="besonderhe/id__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onversigtigheid"><i>onversigtighe</i><par n="besonderhe/id__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grootindustrie"><i>grootindustrie</i><par n="filosofie__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feesprogram"><i>feesprogram</i><par n="ouderdom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musiekprogram"><i>musiekprogram</i><par n="ouderdom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hondetentoonstelling"><i>hondetentoonstelling</i><par n="aardbewing__n"/></e>
    <e lm="immigrasiekantoor"><i>immigrasiekanto</i><par n="kanto/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skakelkantoor"><i>skakelkanto</i><par n="kanto/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dykwerker"><i>dykwerker</i><par n="artikel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stygbaan"><i>stygba</i><par n="ba/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letterdief"><i>letterdie</i><par n="alternatie/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belastingamptenaar"><i>belastingamptena</i><par n="staatsamptena/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paleisamptenaar"><i>paleisamptena</i><par n="staatsamptena/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herderskultuur"><i>herderskultu</i><par n="avontu/ur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afbraakproduk"><i>afbraakproduk</i><par n="lys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besoekplek"><i>besoekplek</i><par n="ongeluk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voerplek"><i>voerplek</i><par n="ongeluk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eenmansaak"><i>eenmansa</i><par n="sa/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swendelsaak"><i>swendelsa</i><par n="sa/ak__n"/></e>
